src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON x_22_excns_pl !!= * @CODE@ = veljekset

  +Pl      :kse        nom_t           ;
  +Pl      :%>s        gen_ten         ; ! veljesten
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:ks%>i2     gen_tten        ; ! veljeksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:ks%>i2     gen_tten        ; ! veljeksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ks%>i2     par_V           ; ! veljeksii
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ks%>i2i    par_tA          ; ! veljeksiitä
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:ks%>i2     par_A           ; ! veljeksiä
  +Pl+Dial/Var:ks%>i2     par_A           ; ! veljeksiä
!      +Pl+Ill:ksh%>i2in  K               ;
  +Pl      :ks         ill_hiin        ;
  +Pl      :kse%>i2    ess_nnA         ; ! veljeksinnä
  +Pl      :ks%>i2     com_nne         ; ! veljeksine
  +Pl      :kse%>i2    sgpl_cases_odd  ; !! the same affix in sg and pl -- tsekkaa long
  !    +Pl+Par:%>ksii     K               ;

 
 LEXICON n_22_excns_even !!= * @CODE@ = (kuttumus)
+N         :           x_22_excns_even     ;
+N+Sg      :s          nom_R          ;
!+N+Sg      :kse        gen_n_sg       ;

LEXICON x_22_excns_even
  +Sg      :^WG%>s     nom_end        ;
  +Sg      :kse        gen_n_sg       ;
  +Sg      :%>s        par_tA         ;
  +Sg      :ks         ill_heen       ;
!  +Sg      :ks         ill_hVVn       ;
!  +Sg+Ill:ksheen K              ; ! +Pl+Ill:ksh%>i2in K; ! TODO TODO TODO
  +Sg      :kse        ess_nA        ;
  +Sg      :kse        sgpl_cases_even ; ! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :kse        nom_t          ;
  +Pl      :%>s        gen_ten        ; ! kuttumusten
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:ks%>i2     gen_tten       ; ! kuttumuksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:ks%>i2     gen_tten       ; ! kuttumuksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ks%>i2     par_V          ; ! kuttumuksii
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ks%>i2i    par_tA         ; ! kuttumuksiita
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:ks%>i2     par_A          ; ! kuttumuksia
  +Pl+Dial/Var:ks%>i2     par_A          ; ! kuttumuksia
  +Pl      :ks         ill_hiin       ; ! ei ^HMETA? tai edel tai mitään?
  +Pl      :kse%>i2    ess_nA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:kse%>i2    com_ne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:kse%>i2    com_ne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:kse%>i2    com_ne         ;
  +Pl      :kse%>i2    sgpl_cases_even ; ! the same affix in sg and pl -- tsekkaa long
 ! +Pl+Par:%>ksii     K              ;


 LEXICON n_22_excns_even_pl !!= * @CODE@ = (ystävykset)
+N         :           x_22_excns_even_pl     ;

LEXICON x_22_excns_even_pl

  +Pl      :kse        nom_t          ;
  +Pl      :%>s        gen_ten        ; ! ystävysten
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:ks%>i2     gen_tten       ; ! ystävyksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:ks%>i2     gen_tten       ; ! ystävyksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ks%>i2     par_V          ; ! ystävyksii
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ks%>i2i    par_tA         ; ! ystävyksiita
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:ks%>i2     par_A          ; ! ystävyksiä
  +Pl+Dial/Var:ks%>i2     par_A          ; ! ystävyksiä
  +Pl      :ks         ill_hiin       ; ! ei ^HMETA? tai edel tai mitään?
  +Pl      :kse%>i2    ess_nA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:kse%>i2    com_ne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:kse%>i2    com_ne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:kse%>i2    com_ne         ;
  +Pl      :kse%>i2    sgpl_cases_even ; ! the same affix in sg and pl -- tsekkaa long
 ! +Pl+Par:%>ksii     K              ;



!LEXICON vanha_et_he
!        +N:^WG        #               ;

!LEXICON vanha_n_42 ! itse asiassa n_42even
!     +N+Sg:se         sgpl_cases_even ; !! these two lexica for cases with
!     +N+Pl:s%>i2      sgpl_cases_even ; !! the same affix in sg and pl
!        +N:           nen             ;
! +N+Pl+Com:s%>i2%>ne  K               ;

LEXICON n_22_inen ! nainen, kainulainen
+N         :  x_22_inen ;
+N+Sg      :s nom_R      ;


LEXICON x_22_inen ! varovainen
  +Sg      :ne        nom_n           ;
  +Sg      :se        gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg      :s         par_tA          ;
  +Sg      :se^HMETA  ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :se        ess_nA          ;
  +Sg      :se        sgpl_cases_even ; !! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :se        nom_t           ;
  +Pl      :s         gen_ten         ; ! kainulaisten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ss%>i2i   par_end         ; ! kainulaissii
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ss%>i2i   par_tA          ; ! kainulaissiita, naissiita
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:s%>i2     par_A           ; ! kainulaisia
  +Pl+Dial/Var:s%>i2     par_A           ; ! kainulaisia
  +Pl      :s         ill_hiin        ; ! NB testing, used to be next line: UNDOMMENT
!          +Pl:sh%>i2    horterillpl    ;
  +Pl      :se%>i2    ess_nA          ; ! naisina
  +Pl      :s%>i2     com_ne          ;
  +Pl      :s%>i2     sgpl_cases_even ; !! the same affix in sg and pl

LEXICON n_22_inen_odd !!= @CODE@ ihminen
+N         :  x_22_inen_odd ;
+N+Sg      :s nom_R         ; ! ihmiskala

LEXICON x_22_inen_odd
  +Sg      :nen       nom_end        ;
  +Sg      :se        gen_n_sg       ;
  +Sg      :s         par_tA         ;
  +Sg      :se^HMETA  ill_hVVn       ;
  +Sg      :se        ess_nnA        ;
  +Sg      :se        sgpl_cases_odd ; !! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :se        nom_t          ;
  +Pl      :s         gen_ten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ss%>i2i   par_end        ; ! ihmissii
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ss%>i2i   par_tA         ; ! ihmissiitä
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:s%>i2     par_A          ; ! ihmisiä
  +Pl+Dial/Var:s%>i2     par_A          ; ! ihmisiä
  +Pl      :s         ill_hiin       ; ! ihmishiin
  +Pl      :s%>i2     ess_nnA        ; !
  +Pl+Dial/Por:s%>i2     com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:s%>i2     com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:s%>i2     com_nne        ;
  +Pl      :s%>i2     sgpl_cases_odd ; !! the same affix in sg and pl

LEXICON n_22_inen_pl ! !!= @CODE@ tervheiset tervhei
+N+Pl      :%>se       nom_t          ;
+N+Pl      :s          gen_ten        ;
+N+Pl+Dial/Por:ss%>i2     par_V          ; ! tervhehissii
+N+Pl+Dial/Por:ss%>i2i    par_tA         ; ! tervhehissiitä
+N+Pl+Dial/Jok:s%>i2      par_A          ; ! tervhehisiä
+N+Pl+Dial/Var:s%>i2      par_A          ; ! tervhehisiä
!      +N+Pl+Ill:sh%>i2in   K              ;
+N+Pl      :s          ill_hiin       ;
+N+Pl      :se%>i2     ess_nnA        ;
+N+Pl      :s%>i2      com_nne        ; ! TODO onko tässä kaksi nn:ää?
+N+Pl      :s%>i2      sgpl_cases_odd ; !! the same affix in sg and pl

LEXICON n_22_inen_pl_even ! !!= @CODE@ olympialaiset
+N+Pl      :%>se       nom_t          ;
+N+Pl      :s          gen_ten        ;
+N+Pl+Dial/Por:ss%>i2     par_V          ; ! tervhehissii
+N+Pl+Dial/Por:ss%>i2i    par_tA         ; ! tervhehissiitä
+N+Pl+Dial/Jok:s%>i2      par_A          ; ! tervhehisiä
+N+Pl+Dial/Var:s%>i2      par_A          ; ! tervhehisiä
!      +N+Pl+Ill:sh%>i2in   K              ;
+N+Pl      :s          ill_hiin       ;
+N+Pl      :se%>i2     ess_nA        ;
+N+Pl      :s%>i2      com_ne        ; ! TODO onko tässä kaksi nn:ää?
+N+Pl      :s%>i2      sgpl_cases_even ; !! the same affix in sg and pl
