src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
makkaratianen:makkara#tia n_22_inen_odd ;
nelivartinen:neli#varti n_22_inen_odd ;
pakkanen:pakka n_22_inen_odd ;
sokkeripalanen:sokkeri#pala n_22_inen_odd ;
kurikkakymmenen:kurikka#kymme n_22_inen_odd ;
ystävykset:ystävy n_22_excns_even_pl ;
budsetteeraminen:budsetteerami n_22_inen ;
niittäminen:niittämi n_22_inen ;
kokhoonpaneminen:kokhoon#panemi n_22_inen ;
rajanvetäminen:rajan#vetämi n_22_inen ;
veronlaskeminen:veron#laskemi n_22_inen ;
väjenkulkeminen:väjen#kulkemi n_22_inen ;
hallitteminen:hallittemi n_22_inen_odd ;
kuluttaminen:kuluttami n_22_inen_odd ;
kukastaminen:kukastami n_22_inen_odd ;
soppeutuminen:soppeutumi n_22_inen_odd ;
suhtaantuminen:suhtaantumi n_22_inen_odd ;
mustasiipinen:musta#siipi n_22_inen_odd ;
kokonhainen+Err/Orth:kokonai n_22_inen ;
kuukhainen:kuukhai n_22_inen_odd ;
munhainen:munhai n_22_inen_odd ;
päänalunen:pään#alu n_22_inen_odd ;
kokkaaminen:kokkaami n_22_inen ;
lausuminen:lausumi n_22_inen ;
koulaaminen:koulaami n_22_inen ;
uuđestipitäminen:uuđesti#pitämi n_22_inen ;
pattoominen:pattoomi n_22_inen ;
loppiainen:loppiai n_22_inen ;
kraviaiset:kraviai n_22_inen_pl_even ;
olympialaiset:olympialai n_22_inen_pl_even ;
vesikaari-ihmiset:vesikaari-#ihmi n_22_inen_pl ;
satheenkaari-ihmiset:satheenkaari-#ihmi n_22_inen_pl ;
painijainen:painijai n_22_inen ;
vestapohjainen:vesta#pohjai n_22_inen_odd ;
jiekkainen:jiekkai n_22_inen_odd ;
singalilainen:singalilai n_22_inen_odd ;
ukrainalainen:ukrainalai n_22_inen_odd ;
itaalialainen:itaalialai n_22_inen ;
työsiirtolainen:työ#siirtolai n_22_inen ;
matkalainen:matkalai n_22_inen ;
saksalainen:saksalai n_22_inen ;
ruiđalainen:ruiđalai n_22_inen ;
pohjaissaamelainen:pohjais#saamelai n_22_inen ;
annijokilainen:anni#jokilai n_22_inen ;
marilainen:marilai n_22_inen ;
englantilainen:englantilai n_22_inen_odd ;
naavuonolainen:naavuonolai n_22_inen ;
arpulainen:arpulai n_22_inen ;
postinkäyminen:postin#käymi n_22_inen_odd ;
alaspainaminen:alaspainami n_22_inen ;
rahoittaminen:rahoittami n_22_inen_odd ;
seulavaiset:seulavai n_22_inen_pl ;
tervheiset:tervhei n_22_inen_pl ;
päässiinen:päässii n_22_inen_odd ;
palkinen:palki n_22_inen_odd ;
kaksikielinen:kaksi#kieli n_22_inen_odd ;
eđelinen:eđeli n_22_inen ;
jälleenrakentaminen:jälleen#rakentami n_22_inen_odd ;
maalaaminen:maalaami n_22_inen ;
lainantaminen:lain#antami n_22_inen ;
kuitteeraaminen:kuitteeraami n_22_inen_odd ;
asumabiilikohtaaminen:asuma#biili#kohtaami n_22_inen ;
jakaminen:jakami n_22_inen ;
perustaminen:perustami n_22_inen_odd ;
pellaaminen:pellaami n_22_inen ;
puheleminen:puhelemi n_22_inen_odd ;
faaki-ihminen:faaki-#ihmi n_22_inen_odd ;
privaatti-ihminen:privaatti-#ihmi n_22_inen_odd ;
johtaminen:johtami n_22_inen ;
rahankokkoominen:rahan#kokkoomi n_22_inen ;
huominen:huomi n_22_inen_odd ;
ruiđalaistuminen:ruiđalaistumi n_22_inen ;
keittäminen:keittämi n_22_inen ;
veđonlyöminen:veđon#lyömi n_22_inen_odd ;
työhevoinen:työ#hevoi n_22_inen_odd ;
uutinen:uuti n_22_inen_odd ;
hytiäinen:hytiäi n_22_inen ;
päässiäinen:päässiäi n_22_inen_odd ;
ristiäiset:ristiäi n_22_inen_pl_even ;
hautajaiset:hautajai n_22_inen_pl_even ;
kuukautiset:kuukauti n_22_inen_pl_even ;
jättiläinen:jättiläi n_22_inen ;
valittaminen:valittami n_22_inen_odd ;
vihavenäläinen:viha#venäläi n_22_inen ;
jyvänkylvääminen:jyvän#kylväämi n_22_inen ;
räppääminen:räppäämi n_22_inen ;
hyvinvoiminen:hyvin#voimi n_22_inen_odd ;
veikkonen:veikko n_22_inen_odd ;
hevonen:hevo n_22_inen_odd ;
kvaliteetinvarmistus:kvaliteetin#varmistu n_22_excns_even ;
sovitus:sovit2u n_22_excns_even ;
arvatus:arvat2u n_22_excns_even ;
kasvatus:kasvat2u n_22_excns_even ;
kuljetus:kuljet2u n_22_excns_even ;
perusopetus:perus#opet2u n_22_excns_even ;
trahteeraus:trahteerau n_22_excns_even ;
ylikansoitus+Err/Orth:yli#kansot2u n_22_excns_even ;
allekirjoitus:alle#kirjoit2u n_22_excns_even ;
sieväkirjoitus:sievä#kirjoit2u n_22_excns_even ;
varoitus:varoit2u n_22_excns_even ;
vastahuomhautus:vasta#huomhaut2us n_22_excns_even ;
sekotus:sekot2u n_22_excns_even ;
verotus:verot2u n_22_excns_even ;
vaikutus:vaikut2u n_22_excns_even ;
rannikkoasutus:rannikko#asut2u n_22_excns_even ;
kassuutus:kassuut2u n_22_excns_even ;
implementeeraus:implementeerau n_22_excns_even ;
vahvistus:vahvistu n_22_excns_even ;
kapistus:kapistu n_22_excns_even ;
dramatiseeraus:dramatiseerau n_22_excns_even ;
elläintensuojelus:elläinten#suojelu n_22_excns_even ;
faakimuistelus:faaki#muistelu n_22_excns_even ;
iltajumalanpalvelus:iltajumalan#palvelu n_22_excns_even ;
julkisuusarvelus:julkisuus#arvelu n_22_excns_even ;
suostumus:suostumu n_22_excns_even ;
kokemus:kokemu n_22_excns_even ;
tervheystutkimus:tervheys#tutkimu n_22_excns_even ;
yhtheistyösopimus:yhtheistyö#sopimu n_22_excns_even ;
anomus:anomu n_22_excns_even ;
asumarakenus:asuma#rakenu n_22_excns_even ;
runkorakenus:runko#rakenu n_22_excns_even ;
kustannus:kustannu n_22_excns_even ;
sisarukset:sisaru n_22_excns_even_pl ;
kattostus:kattostu n_22_excns_even ;
unistus:unistu n_22_excns_even ;
priimustus:priimustu n_22_excns_even ;
nimitys:nimit2y n_22_excns_even ;
äärrytys:äärryt2y n_22_excns_even ;
pääskynen:pääsky n_22_inen_odd ;
uusviljelys:uus#viljely n_22_excns_even ;
ymmärrys:ymmärry n_22_excns_even ;
virkistys:virkisty n_22_excns_even ;
